New York, session 2025-2026, A8367.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 504-a to read as follows: 3 § 504-a. Voluntary disclosure of non-apparent disability. 1. For the 4 purposes of this section: 5 (a) "Non-apparent disability" means a medically documented physical, 6 mental, intellectual, or neurological condition that is not readily 7 visible but may affect a person's ability to communicate, respond to law 8 enforcement commands, or otherwise interact in stressful environments. 9 (b) "Voluntary disability indicator" means a discrete symbol approved 10 by the commissioner to indicate that an individual has a non-apparent 11 disability. 12 2. (a) The commissioner shall establish a process by which a person, 13 or the parent or legal guardian of a minor or dependent adult, may 14 voluntarily request, through an application process, that a disability 15 indicator be placed on the individual's driver's license or non-driver 16 identification card. 17 (b) The application shall include: 18 (i) certification from a licensed physician, psychologist, or other 19 qualified healthcare provider affirming the presence of a non-apparent 20 disability; and 21 (ii) a signed authorization by the applicant, or legal guardian where 22 applicable, to place the indicator on their license or non-driver iden- 23 tification card. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11916-01-5 A. 8367 2 1 3. (a) The disability indicator shall be a small, discreet symbol such 2 as a butterfly, or other symbol designated by the commissioner, that 3 does not disclose the specific nature of the disability. 4 (b) The presence of the disability indicator on a license or identifi- 5 cation card shall not be used for any purpose other than to assist law 6 enforcement and emergency personnel in providing appropriate support 7 during interactions. 8 (c) Information related to the disability shall be subject to privacy 9 protections under state and federal law, and shall not be disclosed 10 except as authorized by the applicant. 11 4. The commissioner, in consultation with the office for people with 12 developmental disabilities and the department of health, shall develop 13 and disseminate educational materials for law enforcement, emergency 14 responders, and the public regarding the purpose and use of the disabil- 15 ity indicator. 16 5. No additional fee shall be charged for the inclusion of the volun- 17 tary disability indicator. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 19 have become a law.